Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2853.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-17-26 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17 entitled "Licensing
of Healthcare Facilities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17-26. Emergency health care.
(a) Every healthcare facility that has an emergency medical-care unit, including
freestanding emergency-care facilities, shall provide to every person prompt, life-saving, medical-
care treatment in an emergency, and a sexual-assault examination for victims of sexual assault,
without discrimination on account of economic status or source of payment, and without delaying
treatment for the purpose of a prior discussion of the source of payment unless the delay can be
imposed without material risk to the health of the person.
(b) Every healthcare facility as provided in subsection (a) of this section that provides
emergency treatment to a victim of sexual assault shall promptly provide:
(1) Medically and factually accurate and objective written information prepared by the
director of the department of health about emergency contraception;
(2) Information about the availability of emergency contraception; and
(3) Upon request by the victim, emergency contraception.
(b)(c) Violations of this section shall be reported to the director of the state department of
health who shall investigate the violations as the director deems appropriate.
(d) The director of the department of health may promulgate rules, regulations, and/or
guidance to carry out the provisions of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004975
========
LC004975 - Page 2 of 3